Utah statutes.
63J-4a-501.   Duty to report potential Medicaid fraud to the office or fraud unit.

(1)  A health care professional, a provider, or a state or local government official or employee who becomes aware of fraud, waste, or abuse shall report the fraud, waste, or abuse to the office or the fraud unit.

(2)  A person who makes a report under Subsection (1) may request that the person's name not be released in connection with the investigation.

(3)  If a request is made under Subsection (2), the person's identity may not be released to any person or entity other than the office, the fraud unit, or law enforcement, unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders that the person's identity be released.

